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DTC C 1796 / 96 Center DIFF. Lock Position Switch
Circuit

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
This circuit is sending the signal to the ECU by detecting that the transfer center differential is in the ”LOCK”
condition.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

C1796 /96 Centerdiff. lockpositionswitchsignaldoesnotchange.
SCenterdiff. lockpositionswitch
SCenterdiff. lockpositionswitchcircuit

SSuspensioncontrolECU
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Checkoutputsignalofcenterdiff. lockpositionswitch.

INCASEOFUSINGHAND −HELDTESTER:
PREPARATION:
(a)Connect thehand −held tester to theDLC3.
(b)Turn the ignitionswitchONandpush thehand −held testermainswitchON.
(c)Select theDATALISTmodeon thehand −held tester.
CHECK:
Check thecenterdiff. lockpositionswitchconditiondisplayedon thehand −held testerwhenpushing the
center diff. lock switch.
OK:

When the center diff. lock switch pushed once:
”ON” is displayed for center diff. lock position switch condition.
When the center diff. lock switch pushed twice:
”OFF” is displayed for center diff. lock position switch condition.

INCASEOFNOTUSINGHAND −HELDTESTER:
PREPARATION:
Remove the suspension control ECU with connectors still con-
nected.
CHECK:
(a) Turn the ignition switch ON.
(b) Measure voltage between terminal EXI of suspension

control ECU connector and body ground when the center
diff. lockswitch ispushed twice.

OK:

Center diff. lock Switch condition Voltage

Pushed once Below 1.5V

Pushed twice 9 − 14 V

OK No problem.

NG
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2 Check center diff. lock position switch.

PREPARATION:
(a) Disconnect the center diff. lock position switch connector.
(b) Remove the center diff. lock position switch (See page

TR−9) .
CHECK:
Measure resistance between the terminal 1 and 2 of center diff.
lock position switch connector when the center diff. lock posi-
tion switch pushed and released.
OK:

Switch condition Resistance

Pushed 0 � (Continuity)

Released � � (Open)

NG Replace center diff. lock position switch.

OK

3 Check for open and short circuit in harness and connector between center diff.
lock position switch and suspension control ECU (See page IN−35).

NG Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK

Check and replace suspension control ECU.


